Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.30.040

Recordkeeping. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1) The sponsor of an electioneering communication shall preserve all financial records relating to the communication, including books of account, bills, receipts, contributor information, and ledgers, for not less than five calendar years following the year in which the communication was broadcast, transmitted, mailed, erected, or otherwise published.

(2) All reports filed under RCW 29B.30.020 shall be certified as correct by the sponsor. If the sponsor is an individual using his or her own funds to pay for the communication, the certification shall be signed by the individual. If the sponsor is a political committee, the certification shall be signed by the committee treasurer. If the sponsor is another entity, the certification shall be signed by the individual responsible for authorizing the expenditure on the entity's behalf.

[ 2024 c 164 s 436; 2010 c 204 s 504; 2005 c 445 s 5. Formerly RCW 42.17A.315, 42.17.575.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.

Effective dates—2005 c 445: See note following RCW 29B.30.010.